Hawaii statutes.
§481R-9 Required disclosures. (a)
Each vehicle protection product warranty marketed, sold, offered for sale,
issued, made, proposed to be made, or administered in this State shall be
written, printed, or typed, in clear, understandable, and easy to read
language, and shall disclose the applicable requirements set forth in this
section.

(b) The obligations of a vehicle protection
product warranty that are insured under a reimbursement insurance policy shall
contain a statement substantially similar to the following:

"Obligations
of the warrantor under this vehicle protection product are insured under a
reimbursement insurance policy."

(c) The vehicle protection product warranty
shall state the name and address of the insurer and state that if a covered
service is not provided by the warrantor before the sixty-first day after the
date the consumer provides proof of loss, the consumer may apply for
reimbursement directly to the vehicle protection product warrantor's
reimbursement insurance company.

(d) Each vehicle protection product warranty
shall state the name, address, and phone number of the warrantor. All
warrantors shall report to the department before the thirty-first day after the
date of any change in the information required to be provided in this
subsection.

(e) Each vehicle protection product warranty
shall identify any administrator, if different from the warrantor, the vehicle
protection product seller, and the consumer, if the name of the consumer has
been provided by the consumer. The identities of those persons shall not be
required to be preprinted on the warranty and may be added to the warranty at
the time of sale.

(f) Each vehicle protection product warranty
shall state the product's purchase price, or the warrantor's suggested purchase
price, and the terms under which the product is sold. The purchase price shall
not be required to be preprinted on the vehicle protection product warranty and
may be negotiated with the consumer at the time of sale.

(g) Each vehicle protection product warranty
shall:

(1) Specify the products and services to be
provided and any limitations, exceptions, or exclusions;

(2) Specify any restrictions governing the
transferability of the vehicle protection product;

(3) State the duties of the consumer, including any
duty to protect against any further damage and any requirement to follow the
warranty's instructions;

(4) State the name, mailing address, and telephone
number of the department; and

(5) Include a statement that unresolved complaints concerning
a registered warrantor or questions concerning the regulation of a warrantor
may be addressed to the department.

(h) The requirements of subsection (g)(4) and
(5) may be stamped on the vehicle protection product warranty. [L 2002, c 237,
pt of §1; am L 2008, c 19, §42]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next